Hawaii statutes.
§291C-170 Revocation or suspension of
license. In addition to the penalties heretofore provided, the court may
revoke or may suspend, for a period not to exceed one year, the license of any
driver convicted of a violation of any section or provision of the state
traffic laws involving a vehicle in motion. [L 1978, c 111, pt of §2; am L
1979, c 105, §31]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next